Washington statutes.
RCW 33.32.050

Power of attorney for service of process.

No foreign savings and loan association or like corporation shall do business in this state until it shall file with the director a written irrevocable power of attorney providing that service upon the director of any process issued against it by any court in this state shall constitute valid service of such process upon it. Such service shall be had by serving upon the director two copies of such summons or other process, together with the sum of two dollars. The director, upon receipt of any such summons or other process, shall forthwith transmit, by registered mail, one copy thereof to the principal office of such foreign association or corporation.

[ 1994 c 92 s 452; 1945 c 235 s 84; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-203. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 87; 1890 p 56 ss 9, 10, 12.]